Utah statutes.
57-11-19.   Extradition proceedings against person charged with crime.
In the proceedings for extradition of a person charged with a crime under this
act, it need not be shown that the person whose surrender is demanded has fled
from justice or at the time of the commission of the crime was in the
demanding or other state.
